Washington statutes.
RCW 35.81.910

Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "community renewal law."

[ 2002 c 218 s 21; 1965 c 7 s 35.81.910. Prior: 1957 c 42 s 20.]

NOTES:

Severability—Savings—Construction—2002 c 218: See notes following RCW 35.81.005.